Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-605
Dispatches; transmission; duties.

All telegraph companies and press associations or corporations operating telegraph lines in this state shall (1) transmit and forward all dispatches directed to newspapers, private individuals, or public officers with impartiality in the order in which they are received and (2) use due diligence in their delivery without discrimination as to any person or party to whom they may be directed.

Laws 1883, c. 80, § 5, p. 323;

R.S.1913, § 7399;

C.S.1922, § 7074;

C.S.1929, § 86-105;

R.S.1943, § 86-105;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-105;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 367.

A telegraph company is liable for failure to deliver message promptly when contents show importance. Western Union Tel. Co. v. Church, 3 Neb. Unof. 22, 90 N.W. 878 (1902).